test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adjDES_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that have a subform.

Tests:
  Adjective - almulasj: # ÅLLAGASJ, DÁRBBOLASJ
    almulasj+A+Attr: almulasj
    almulasj+A+Err/Orth+Attr: almmulasj
    almulasj+A+Sg+Nom: almulasj
    almulasj+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: almmulasj
    almulasj+A+Sg+Acc: almulattjav
    almulasj+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: almmulattjav
    almulasj+A+Pl+Nom: almulattja
    almulasj+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Nom: almmulattja
    almulasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: almulabbo
    almulasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [almulæbbo, almuläbbo, almulubbo]
    almulasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [almulap, almulup]
    almulasj+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: almulamos
    almulasj+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [almulæmos, almulämos, almulumos]

  Adjective - bavlak: # AGAdj
    bavlak+A+Attr: bavlak
    bavlak+A+Err/Orth+Attr: bavhlak
    bavlak+A+Sg+Nom: bavlak
    bavlak+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: bavhlak
    bavlak+A+Sg+Ine: bavlagin
    bavlak+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: bavhlagin
    bavlak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bavlak+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: []
    bavlak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - duplæksa: # BASSTEL, BOREÁLA
    duplæksa+A+Attr: duplevsa
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Nom: duplæksa
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Gen: []
    duplæksa+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    duplæksa+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - goanntsá: # GIEVRRA, HÁVSSKE
    goanntsá+A+Attr: goanntsás
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsá
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Ela: goanntsás
    goanntsá+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsáp
    goanntsá+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsámus

  Adjective - gájvas: # TJIEGOS
    gájves+v2+A+Attr: gájvas
    gájves+v1+A+Attr: gájves
    gájves+v2+A+Sg+Nom: gájvas
    gájves+v1+A+Sg+Nom: gájves
    gájves+v2+A+Sg+Gen: gájvvasa
    gájves+v1+A+Sg+Gen: gájvvása
    gájves+v2+A+Sg+Acc: gájvvasav
    gájves+v1+A+Sg+Acc: gájvvásav
    gájves+v2+A+Sg+Ill: gájvvasij
    gájves+v1+A+Sg+Ill: gájvvásij
    gájves+v2+A+Sg+Ine: gájvvasin
    gájves+v1+A+Sg+Ine: gájvvásin
    gájves+v2+A+Sg+Ela: gájvvasis
    gájves+v1+A+Sg+Ela: gájvvásis
    gájves+v2+A+Sg+Com: gájvvasijn
    gájves+v2+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: gájvvasijna
    gájves+v1+A+Sg+Com: gájvvásijn
    gájves+v1+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: gájvvásijna
    gájves+v2+A+Pl+Nom: gájvvasa
    gájves+v1+A+Pl+Nom: gájvvása
    gájves+v2+A+Pl+Gen: gájvvasij
    gájves+v1+A+Pl+Gen: gájvvásij
    gájves+v2+A+Pl+Acc: gájvvasijt
    gájves+v1+A+Pl+Acc: gájvvásijt
    gájves+v2+A+Pl+Ill: gájvvasijda
    gájves+v1+A+Pl+Ill: gájvvásijda
    gájves+v2+A+Pl+Ine: gájvvasijn
    gájves+v1+A+Pl+Ine: gájvvásijn
    gájves+v2+A+Pl+Ela: gájvvasijs
    gájves+v1+A+Pl+Ela: gájvvásijs
    gájves+v2+A+Pl+Com: gájvvasij
    gájves+v1+A+Pl+Com: gájvvásij
    gájves+v2+A+Ess: gájvvasin
    gájves+v1+A+Ess: gájvvásin
    gájves+v2+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gájvvasabbo
    gájves+v2+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [gájvvasæbbo, gájvvasäbbo, gájvvasubbo]
    gájves+v1+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gájvvásabbo
    gájves+v1+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [gájvvásæbbo, gájvvásäbbo, gájvvásubbo]
    gájves+v2+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [gájvvasap, gájvvasup]
    gájves+v1+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [gájvvásap, gájvvásup]
    gájves+v2+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gájvvasamos
    gájves+v2+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [gájvvasumos, gájvvasæmos, gájvvasämos]
    gájves+v1+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gájvvásamos
    gájves+v1+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [gájvvásæmos, gájvvásämos, gájvvásumos]


  Adjective - gåntsas: #
    gåntsas+A+Attr: gåntsas
    gåntsas+A+Err/Orth+Attr: goantsas
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Nom: gåntsas
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Gen: goanntsasa
    gåntsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsasabbo
    gåntsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [goanntsasæbbo, goanntsasäbbo,goanntsasubbo]
    gåntsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [goanntsasap, goanntsasup]
    gåntsas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsasamos
    gåntsas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [goanntsasæmos, goanntsasämos,goanntsasumos]

  Adjective - hæhkkaráduk: # BASSTEL, AGAdj
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Attr: [hæhkkaráduk, hähkkaráduk, hähkkarádugis, hæhkkarádugis]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkaráduk, hähkkaráduk]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Com: [hæhkkarádugijn, hähkkarádugijn]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: [hähkkarádugijna, hæhkkarádugijna]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugabbo, hähkkarádugabbo]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [hæhkkarádugæbbo, hæhkkarádugäbbo,hæhkkarádugubbo, hähkkarádugubbo, hähkkarádugæbbo, hähkkarádugäbbo]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugamos, hähkkarádugamos]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [hæhkkarádugumos, hähkkarádugumos,hæhkkarádugæmos, hæhkkarádugämos, hähkkarádugämos, hähkkarádugæmos]

  Adjective - iehpeformælla: # ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    iehpeformælla+A+Attr: iehpeformella
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Der+Attr: iehpeformellalasj
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Orth+Attr: [iehpeformela, iehpeformála, iehpeformálalasj]
    iehpeformælla+A+Sg+Nom: [iehpeformælla, iehpeformälla]
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [iehpeformella, iehpeformálla, iehpeformálalasj]
    iehpeformælla+A+Sg+Ine: iehpeformellan
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: iehpeformálan
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Ine: iehpeformellalattjan
    iehpeformælla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    iehpeformælla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - lånjok: # BASSTEL, LEXATTR
    lånjok+A+Attr: [lånjogis, låddnjis]
    lånjok+A+Err/Orth+Attr: lånjugis
    lånjok+A+Sg+Nom: lånjok
    lånjok+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: lånjuk
    lånjok+A+Sg+Gen: lånjoga
    lånjok+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: lånjuga
    lånjok+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: lånjogabbo
    lånjok+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [lånjogæbbo, lånjogäbbo, lånjogubbo]
    lånjok+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [lånjugabbo]
    lånjok+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [lånjugæbbo, lånjugäbbo,lånjugubbo]
    lånjok+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: lånjogamos
    lånjok+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [lånjogæmos, lånjogämos,lånjogumos]
    lånjok+A+Err/Orth+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: lånjugamos
    lånjok+A+Err/Orth+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [lånjugæmos, lånjugämos,lånjugumos]

  Adjective - nanos: # TJIEGOS, NUORTTALABBO
    nanos+A+Attr: nanos
    nanos+A+Err/Orth+Attr: nanus
    nanos+A+Sg+Nom: nanos
    nanos+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: nanus
    nanos+A+Sg+Acc: nannusav
    nanos+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: nanusav
    nanos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: nannusabbo
    nanos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [nannusæbbo, nannusäbbo,nannusubbo]
    nanos+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: nanusabbo
    nanos+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [nanusæbbo, nanusäbbo,nanusubbo]
    nanos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: nannusamos
    nanos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [nannusæmos, nannusämos,nannusumos]
    nanos+A+Err/Orth+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: nanusamos
    nanos+A+Err/Orth+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [nanusumos,nanusæmos, nanusämos]

  Adjective - tsåhkevigák: # At, AGAdj
    tsåhkevigák+A+Attr: [tsåhkevigák, tsåhkevigágis]
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Nom: tsåhkevigák
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Com: tsåhkevigágijn
    tsåhkevigák+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: tsåhkevigágijna
    tsåhkevigák+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tsåhkevigák+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Adjective - tjábbámus: # TJAVGGÁMUS
    tjábbámus+A+Err/Der+Gram/Superl+Sg+Nom: tjábbámus
    tjábbámus+A+Err/Der+Gram/Superl+Sg+Acc: tjábbámusáv
    tjábbámus+A+Err/Der+Gram/Superl+Sg+Ill: tjábbámussaj
  
  Adjective - sahtemus: # TJAVGGÁMUS, Err/Der
    sahtemus+A+Err/Der+Gram/Superl+Sg+Nom: sahtemus
    sahtemus+A+Err/Der+Gram/Superl+Sg+Acc: sahtemusáv
    sahtemus+A+Err/Der+Gram/Superl+Sg+Ill: sahtemussaj
    
  Adjective - antisosiálla: #  ÁLLA
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Attr: antisosiálalasj
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: antisosiálalasj
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Gen: antisosiálalattja
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: antisosiálalabbo
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Der/AAdv+Adv: antisosiálalattjat


  Adjective - aspektuálla: # ÁLLA
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Attr: aspektuellalasj
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: aspektuellalasj
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: aspektuellalabbo
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Der/AAdv+Adv: aspektuellalattjat


  Adjective - paralælla: # ÆLLA
    paralælla+A+Err/Der+Attr: paralellalasj
    paralælla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: paralellalasj
    paralælla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: paralellalabbo
    
  Adjective - senijlla: # 
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Attr: [senijlalasj]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: [senijlalasj]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Acc: [senijlalattjav]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalabbo]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalamos]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalappot]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalabmusit]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalappusj]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalapputjit]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalattjat]
    

  Adjective - destruktijvalasj: # DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+Attr:  [destruktijvalasj]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalasj]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+Sg+Ela: [destruktijvalattjas]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalabbo]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalamos]
